Utah statutes.
17-27a-606.   Common or community area parcels on a plat -- No separate ownership -- Ownership interest equally divided among other parcels on plat and included in description of other parcels.

(1) (a)  A parcel designated as a common or community area on a plat recorded in compliance with this part may not be separately owned or conveyed independent of the other lots, units, or parcels created by the plat unless:

(i)  the parcel is being acquired by a county for a governmental purpose; and

(ii)  the conveyance is approved by the owners of at least 75% of the lots, units, or parcels on the plat, after the county gives its approval.

(b)  A notice of the approval required in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall be:

(i)  attached as an exhibit to the document of conveyance; or

(ii)  recorded concurrently with the conveyance as a separate document.

(2)  The ownership interest in a parcel described in Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  for purposes of assessment, be divided equally among all parcels created by the plat, unless a different division of interest for assessment purposes is indicated on the plat or an accompanying recorded document; and

(b)  be considered to be included in the description of each instrument describing a parcel on the plat by its identifying plat number, even if the common or community area interest is not explicitly stated in the instrument.

